Tennessee, session 114, SB0597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-1-301, is amended by deleting the
last sentence and substituting:
By January 15 of each year, the commissioner shall report to the chair of the committee
of the house of representatives with subject matter jurisdiction over health-related
matters and the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate on the progress
of this strategy.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0597
002199
- 1 -